Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202632-1522.01
Initials or signatures on ballots; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who forges or falsely places any initials or signatures on any ballot under section 32-916 or 32-947 shall be guilty of a Class III felony.

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 42.
April 16, 2026